activities/make/phon.twolc
Alphabet

A B C D E F G H I J K L M N O P Q R S T U V W X Y Z
a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s t u v w x y z

%{S%}:s  ! archiphoneme
%>:0

;

Rules

! "Turn {S} into s"
! %{S%}:s <=> _ ;

"y:i before inflectional s"
y:i <=> _ (0:e) %>:0 %{S%}:s .#. ;

"0:e after y:i before inflectional s"
0:e <=> y:i _ %>:0 %{S%}:s .#. ;
